en: Congas
xx: Congas
cs: Conga
da: Congaer
de: Congas
es: Congas
fr: Congas
it: Conga
ja: コンガ
nl: Conga's
no: Congatrommer
pl: Kongi
pt: Congas
ru: Конги
sv: Congas
tr: Kongalar

en: Frame Drums
xx: Frame Drums
cs: Rámové bubny
da: Rammetromme
de: Rahmentrommeln
es: Tambores de marco
fr: Tambours sur cadre
it: Tamburi a cornice
ja: フレームドラム
nl: Raamtrommels
no: Rammetrommer
pl: Bębny obręczowe
pt: Tamborins
ru: Бубны
sv: Ramtrummor
tr: Bendirler

en: Goblet Drums
xx: Goblet Drums
cs: Doumbeky a djembe
da: Goblet-tromme
de: Beckentrommeln
es: Tambores de copa
fr: Darboukas
it: Tamburi a calice
ja: ゴブレットドラム
nl: Vaastrommels
no: Darbuka
pl: Bębny kielichowe
pt: Djembês
ru: Дарбуки
sv: Bägarformade trummor
tr: Darbukalar

en: Tablas
xx: Tablas
cs: Tabla
da: Tabla-trommer
de: Tablas
es: Tablas
fr: Tablas
it: Tabla
ja: タブラ
nl: Tabla's
no: Tabla-trommer
pl: Table
pt: Tablas
ru: Таблы
sv: Tablas
tr: Tablalar

en: Talking Drums
xx: Talking Drums
cs: Tamy (mluvící bubny)
da: Talende trommer
de: Sprechtrommeln
es: Tambores parlantes
fr: Tamas
it: Tamburi parlanti
ja: トーキングドラム
nl: Sprekende trommels
no: Talende trommer
pl: Bębny gadające
pt: Tambor falante
ru: Говорящие барабаны
sv: Talande trummor
tr: Konuşan Davullar

en: Musical Blocks
xx: Musical Blocks
cs: Hudební kostky
da: Musikklodser
de: Holzblöcke
es: Cajas chinas
fr: Blocs musicaux
it: Blocchi musicali
ja: パーカッションブロック
nl: Muziekblokken
no: Musikkblokker
pl: Klocki muzyczne
pt: Blocos musicais
ru: Музыкальные блоки
sv: Musikblock
tr: Ses Blokları

en: Musical Cowbells
xx: Musical Cowbells
cs: Kravské zvonce
da: Koklokker
de: Kuhglocken
es: Cencerros
fr: Cencerros
it: Campanacci musicali
ja: カウベル
nl: Koebellen
no: Kubjeller for musikk
pl: Cowbelle
pt: Sinos
ru: Ковбеллы
sv: Koskällor för musik
tr: Müzik İnek Çanları

en: Musical Scrapers & Ratchets
xx: Musical Scrapers & Ratchets
cs: Drhla a řehtačky
da: Guiro og skralder
de: Scraper & Schnarren
es: Güiros y matracas
fr: Güiros et crécelles
it: Güiro e raganelle
ja: ギロ・ラチェット
nl: Güiro's en ratels
no: Skrapeinstrumenter og skraller
pl: Tarki i grzechotki
pt: Reco-reco
ru: Терки и трещотки
sv: Skrapinstrument och harskramlor
tr: Müzik Scraperleri ve Ratchetleri

en: Musical Shakers
xx: Musical Shakers
cs: Hudební shakery
da: Shakere
de: Rasseln
es: Shakers
fr: Hochets à percussion
it: Sonagli musicali
ja: マラカス
nl: Shakers
no: Maracas og rytmeegg
pl: Przeszkadzajki
pt: Chocalhos e maracas
ru: Музыкальные шейкеры
sv: Skakinstrument
tr: Müzik Shakerleri

en: Musical Triangles
xx: Musical Triangles
cs: Triangly
da: Triangler
de: Triangeln
es: Triángulos
fr: Triangles
it: Triangoli musicali
ja: トライアングル
nl: Triangels
no: Triangler
pl: Trójkąty muzyczne
pt: Triângulos
ru: Музыкальные треугольники
sv: Trianglar
tr: Üçgen Ziller

en: Tambourines
xx: Tambourines
cs: Tamburíny
da: Tamburiner
de: Tamburine
es: Panderetas
fr: Tambourins
it: Cembali
ja: タンバリン
nl: Tamboerijnen
no: Tamburiner
pl: Tamburyny
pt: Pandeiros
ru: Тамбурины
sv: Tamburiner
tr: Tefler

en: Vibraslaps
xx: Vibraslaps
cs: Vibraslapy
da: Vibraslap (æselkæber)
de: Vibraslaps
es: Vibraslaps
fr: Vibraslaps
it: Vibraslap
ja: ヴィブラスラップ
nl: Vibraslaps
no: Vibraslap
pl: Vibraslapy
pt: Vibraslaps
ru: Вибраслэпы
sv: Vibraslaps
tr: Vibraslaplar

en: Hi-Hats
xx: Hi-Hats
cs: Hi-hat
da: Hi-hat
de: Hi-Hats
es: Platos hi-hat
fr: Charlestons
it: Charleston
ja: ハイハット
nl: Hi-hats
no: Hi-Hats
pl: Hi-haty
pt: Chimbais
ru: Хай-хеты
sv: Hi-hats
tr: Hi-Hat Ziller

en: Practice Pads
xx: Practice Pads
cs: Cvičné pady
da: Øvepads
de: Übungspads
es: Pads de práctica
fr: Pads d'entraînement
it: Sordine per esercitazioni
ja: ドラム練習パッド
nl: Oefenpads
no: Øvingstrommer
pl: Pady ćwiczeniowe
pt: Pads para treino
ru: Коврики для барабанов
sv: Övningsplattor
tr: Çalışma Pedleri

en: Snare Drums
xx: Snare Drums
cs: Snare bubínky
da: Lilletrommer
de: Snaredrums
es: Cajas claras
fr: Caisses claires
it: Casse chiare
ja: スネアドラム
nl: Snare drums
no: Skarptrommer
pl: Werble
pt: Caixas
ru: Малые барабаны
sv: Virveltrummor
tr: Trampetler

en: Tom-Toms
xx: Tom-Toms
cs: Tomtomy
da: Tamtamer
de: Tom-Toms
es: Tambores tom-tom
fr: Tam-tams
it: Tom-tom
ja: タム
nl: Tom-toms
no: Tamtam-trommer
pl: Tom-tomy
pt: Tom-tons
ru: Том-томы
sv: Pukor
tr: Tamtamlar

en: Pianos
xx: Pianos
cs: Klavíry a pianina
da: Pianoer
de: Klaviere
es: Pianos
fr: Pianos, piano, Piano électrique
it: Pianoforti
ja: ピアノ
nl: Piano's
no: Pianoer
pl: Pianina i fortepiany
pt: Pianos
ru: Фортепиано
sv: Pianon
tr: Piyanolar

en: String Instruments
xx: String Instruments
cs: Strunné nástroje
da: Strengeinstrumenter
de: Saiteninstrumente
es: Instrumentos de cuerda
fr: Instruments à cordes
it: Strumenti a corda
ja: 弦楽器
nl: Snaarinstrumenten
no: Strengeinstrumenter
pl: Instrumenty strunowe
pt: Instrumentos de corda
ru: Струнные инструменты
sv: Stränginstrument
tr: Telli Çalgılar

en: Cellos
xx: Cellos
cs: Violoncella
da: Celloer
de: Cellos
es: Violonchelos
fr: Violoncelles
it: Violoncelli
ja: チェロ
nl: Cello's
no: Celloer
pl: Wiolonczele
pt: Violoncelos
ru: Виолончели
sv: Cellor
tr: Çellolar

en: Guitars
xx: Guitars
cs: Kytary
da: Guitarer
de: Gitarren
es: Guitarras
fr: Guitares, Guitare électrique, guitare acoustique
it: Chitarre
ja: ギター
nl: Gitaren
no: Gitarer
pl: Gitary
pt: Guitarras
ru: Гитары
sv: Gitarrer
tr: Gitarlar